Illinois, session 104th, HB319.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 5changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 405/1-1)  (from Ch. 37, par. 801-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may 8be cited as the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.9(Source: P.A. 85-601.)